Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.655.180

Waivers for educational restructuring programs.

(1) The state board of education may grant waivers to districts from the provisions of statutes or rules relating to: The length of the school year; student-to-teacher ratios; and other administrative rules that in the opinion of the state board of education may need to be waived in order for a district to implement a plan for restructuring its educational program or the educational program of individual schools within the district.

(2) The state board of education may adopt rules establishing the waiver application process under this section.

[ 2018 c 177 s 507; (2018 c 177 s 506 expired June 30, 2019); (2012 c 53 s 9 expired June 30, 2019); (2011 c 260 s 9 expired June 30, 2019); 2009 c 543 s 3; (1997 c 431 s 23 expired June 30, 1999); 1995 c 208 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.630.945.]

NOTES:

Expiration date—2018 c 177 s 506: "Section 506 of this act expires June 30, 2019." [ 2018 c 177 s 704.]

Effective dates—2018 c 177 ss 201, 202, 501-504, 507, and 701: See note following RCW 28A.150.222.

Finding—Intent—2018 c 177: See note following RCW 28A.305.905.

Finding—Intent—2009 c 543: "The legislature continues to support school districts seeking innovations to further the educational experiences of students and staff while also realizing increased efficiencies in day-to-day operations. School districts have suggested that efficiencies in heating, lighting, or maintenance expenses could be possible if districts were given the ability to create a more flexible calendar. Furthermore, the legislature finds that a flexible calendar could be beneficial to student learning by allowing for the use of the unscheduled days for professional development activities, planning, tutoring, special programs, parent conferences, and athletic events. A flexible calendar also has the potential to ease the burden of long commutes on students in rural areas and to lower absenteeism.

School districts in several western states have operated on a four-day school week and report increased efficiencies, family support, and reduced absenteeism, with no negative impact on student learning. Small rural school districts in particular could benefit due to their high per-pupil costs for transportation and utilities. Therefore, the legislature intends to provide increased flexibility to a limited number of school districts to explore the potential value of operating on a flexible calendar, so long as adequate safeguards are put in place to prevent any negative impact on student learning." [ 2009 c 543 s 1.]